Vermont, session 2025-2026, H18.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 674 is amended to read:
§ 674. OPERATING AFTER SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF
LICENSE; PENALTY; REMOVAL OF REGISTRATION PLATES;
TOWING
(a)(1) Except as provided in section 676 of this title, a person whose license
or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked for a
VT LEG #378666 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.18
2025 Page 2 of 6
violation of this section or subsection 1091(b), 1094(b), or 1128(b) or (c) of
this title and who operates or attempts to operate a motor vehicle upon a public
highway before the suspension period imposed for the violation has expired
shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00,
or both.
(2) A On or after December 1, 2016, a person who violates section 676
of this title for the third or subsequent time shall, if the two prior offenses
occurred within two years of the third offense and on or after December 1,
2016 the basis for the third or subsequent offense is a moving violation, be
imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(3) Violations of section 676 of this title that occurred prior to the date a
person successfully completes the DLS Diversion Program shall not be
counted as prior offenses under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(b) Except as authorized in section 1213 of this title, a person whose
license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked
for a violation of section 1201 of this title or has been suspended under section
1205 of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a motor vehicle upon
a public highway before reinstatement of the license shall be imprisoned not
more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. The sentence
shall be subject to the following mandatory minimum terms:
VT LEG #378666 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.18
2025 Page 3 of 6
(1) For the first offense, the defendant shall pay a mandatory minimum
fine of $300.00 or complete 40 hours of community service. In the event that
no term of imprisonment, suspended or to serve, is imposed, the community
service shall be performed within 120 days. Failure to submit proof of
completion of the 40 hours within 120 days shall constitute civil contempt
unless the defendant requests an extension for good cause shown prior to
expiration of the 120 days.
(2) For a second offense occurring within five years, the defendant shall
pay a mandatory minimum fine of $750.00 or complete 80 hours of community
service. In the event that no term of imprisonment, suspended or to serve, is
imposed, the community service shall be performed within 120 days. Failure
to submit proof of completion of the 80 hours within 120 days shall constitute
civil contempt unless the defendant requests an extension for good cause
shown prior to expiration of the 120 days.
(3) For the third offense occurring within five years, the defendant shall
serve at least 12 days of preapproved furlough with community restitution.
(4) For the fourth offense occurring within five years, the defendant
shall serve at least 18 days of preapproved furlough with community
restitution.
VT LEG #378666 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.18
2025 Page 4 of 6
(5) For the fifth and subsequent offenses occurring within five years, the
defendant shall be imprisoned at least 16 consecutive days in a correctional
facility. The sentence may shall not be suspended or deferred.
(c) An enforcement officer shall have the authority to remove any number
plates from a motor vehicle that is being operated by a person in violation of
subsection (a) or (b) of this section. The Commissioner shall be notified in
writing and may, in his or her the Commissioner’s sole discretion, cause the
plates to be returned to the registered owner or lessee for good cause shown.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, when a conviction for
a violation of this section and a conviction for a violation of section 1201 of
this title result from the same incident, any penalty or suspension or revocation
of a person’s license or privilege to operate shall be imposed to be consecutive
and not concurrent.
(e) In determining appropriate fines under this section, the court may take
into account the income of the defendant.
(f) For purposes of this section and section 676 of this title, the suspension
period for a violation of section 1201 or 1205 of this title shall not be deemed
to expire until the person has complied with section 1209a of this title and the
person’s license has been reinstated.
(g) In establishing a prima facie case against a person accused of violating
this section, the court shall accept as evidence a printout attested to by the law
VT LEG #378666 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.18
2025 Page 5 of 6
enforcement officer as the person’s motor vehicle record showing convictions
and resulting license suspensions. The admitted motor vehicle record shall
establish a permissive inference that the person was under suspension on the
dates and time periods set forth in the record. No certified copy shall be
required from the Department of Motor Vehicles to establish the permissive
inference.
(h) At the time of sentencing after a second or subsequent conviction under
subsection (b) of this section, the court may, in addition to any penalty
imposed by law, order that the motor vehicle operated by the person at the time
of the offense be immobilized. At the time of sentencing after a third or
subsequent conviction under subsection (b) of this section, the court may, in
addition to any penalty imposed by law, order that the motor vehicle operated
by the person at the time of the offense be forfeited and sold. Immobilization
and forfeiture procedures under this section shall be conducted in accordance
with the procedures in section 1213c of this title.
(i) A person convicted of violating this section shall be assessed a
surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by
the court. The court shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this
subsection to be credited to the DUI Enforcement Fund. The collection
procedures described in 13 V.S.A. § 5240 shall be utilized in the collection of
this surcharge.
VT LEG #378666 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.18
2025 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378666 v.1